Maryland, session 2025, HB0008.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
21–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(i) “Food” means:
(1) Any substance that is used as food or drink for human beings or as a
component of food or drink for human beings; or
(2) Chewing gum or any substance that is used as a component of chewing
gum.
(k) “Label” means a display of written, printed, or graphic matter on the
container, other than the package liner, of a substance.
(l) “Labeling” means any label or other written or graphic material that:
(1) Is on a substance or its container or its wrapping; or
(2) Accompanies a substance.
(n) (1) “Package” means any container or wrapping of a consumer commodity
that is used for delivery or display to retail consumers.
(2) “Package” does not include any container or wrapping that is used only
for:
(i) Transportation of a consumer commodity in bulk or quantity to
a manufacturer, packer, processor, or wholesale or retail distributor; or
(ii) Shipment or delivery of a consumer commodity to a retail
customer, if the container or wrapping bears no printed material that relates to a particular
consumer commodity.
21–328.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

HOUSE BILL 8 3
(2) “QUALITY DATE” MEANS THE DATE ON A LABEL AFFIXED TO THE
PACKAGING OR CONTAINER OF FOOD AFTER WHICH FOOD QUALITY MAY BEGIN TO
DETERIORATE BUT THE FOOD MAY STILL BE ACCEPTABLE FOR HUMAN
CONSUMPTION.
(3) “SAFETY DATE” MEANS A DATE ON A LABEL AFFIXED TO THE
PACKAGING OR CONTAINER OF PERISHABLE FOOD THAT COMMUNICATES THAT THE
FOOD SHOULD BE CONSUMED OR FROZEN BY THE DATE LISTED.
(4) “SELL BY DATE” MEANS A DATE ON A LABEL AFFIXED TO THE
PACKAGING OR CONTAINER OF FOOD THAT IS NOT A QUALITY DATE OR A SAFETY
DATE AND INDICATES STOCK ROTATION PRIMARILY TO A DISTRIBUTOR OR
RETAILER.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) INFANT FORMULA;
(2) EGGS OR PASTEURIZED IN–SHELL EGGS; OR
(3) BEER AND OTHER MALT BEVERAGES.
(C) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, A FOOD MANUFACTURER, PROCESSOR, OR
RETAILER RESPONSIBLE FOR THE LABELING OF FOOD ITEMS FOR HUMAN
CONSUMPTION THAT OPTS OR IS REQUIRED BY LAW TO INCLUDE A DATE LABEL TO
COMMUNICATE A QUALITY OR SAFETY DATE ON A FOOD ITEM MANUFACTURED ON
OR AFTER JULY 1, 2026, SHALL USE ONE OF THE FOLLOWING TERMS, AS
APPROPRIATE:
(1) (I) “BEST IF USED BY” OR “BEST IF USED OR FROZEN BY” TO
INDICATE THE QUALITY DATE OF THE FOOD ITEM; OR
(II) IF THE FOOD ITEM IS TOO SMALL TO INCLUDE THE LABEL
REQUIRED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS ITEM, “BB”; OR
(2) (I) “USE BY” OR “USE BY OR FREEZE BY” TO INDICATE THE
SAFETY DATE OF THE FOOD ITEM; OR
(II) IF THE FOOD ITEM IS TOO SMALL TO INCLUDE THE LABEL
REQUIRED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS ITEM, “UB”.
(D) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, A PERSON MAY NOT:

HOUSE BILL 8
(1) SELL, OR OFFER FOR SALE, A FOOD ITEM MANUFACTURED FOR
HUMAN CONSUMPTION ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2026, THAT IS LABELED WITH THE
PHRASE “SELL BY”; OR
(2) SELL, OR OFFER FOR SALE, A FOOD ITEM MANUFACTURED FOR
HUMAN CONSUMPTION ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2026, THAT IS NOT LABELED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(E) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, A FOOD RETAILER MAY:
(1) DONATE A FOOD ITEM MANUFACTURED FOR HUMAN
CONSUMPTION THAT IS NOT LABELED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION; AND
(2) SELL, OR OFFER FOR SALE, A FOOD ITEM MANUFACTURED FOR
HUMAN CONSUMPTION LABELED WITH THE PHRASE “PACKED ON” IF THE FOOD
ITEM ALSO DISPLAYS A QUALITY OR SAFETY DATE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(F) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT:
(1) THE SALE, DONATION, OR USE OF A FOOD ITEM MANUFACTURED
FOR HUMAN CONSUMPTION AFTER THE QUALITY DATE;
(2) THE USE OF A LABEL THAT COMMUNICATES THE DATE WINE, A
DISTILLED SPIRIT, OR WINE– OR DISTILLED SPIRIT–BASED PRODUCT WAS
PRODUCED, MANUFACTURED, BOTTLED, OR PACKAGED;
(3) THE USE OF SELL BY DATES THAT ARE PRESENTED IN A CODED
FORMAT THAT ARE NOT EASILY READABLE BY CONSUMERS AND DO NOT USE THE
PHRASE “SELL BY”; OR
(4) THE USE OR DISPLAY OF A LABEL THAT ALLOWS A CONSUMER TO
VIEW ONLINE INFORMATION ABOUT A FOOD ITEM MANUFACTURED FOR HUMAN
CONSUMPTION.
(G) THIS SECTION DOES NOT REQUIRE THE USE OR DISPLAY OF A DATE
LABEL ON A FOOD ITEM UNLESS THE PREPARED FOOD ITEM DISPLAYS A DATE
LABEL.
(H) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CREATE
AN EDUCATIONAL PROGRAM AND EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS TO INFORM
CONSUMERS ABOUT THE MEANING OF QUALITY DATES AND SPECIFIED DATES.

HOUSE BILL 8 5
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL POST ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE
THE EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS CREATED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
21–401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(j) (1) “Grade A milk product” means:
(i) Grade A milk;
(ii) Grade A cream; or
(iii) Any other Grade A milk product that the Secretary designates.
(k) “Grade A Pasteurized Milk Ordinance” means the recommended Grade “A”
Pasteurized Milk Ordinance published by the federal government.
(l) (2) “Grade A milk” means the milk of a cow, goat, or other hooved mammal
produced, processed, pasteurized, bottled, packaged, or prepared in accordance with the
Grade A Pasteurized Milk Ordinance.
(o) (1) “Milk plant” means any place where, for distribution, milk products are:
(i) Processed;
(ii) Pasteurized;
(iii) Bottled or packaged; or
(iv) Prepared.
(2) “Milk plant” does not include a place where milk products are sold at
retail only.
(p) “Milk processor” means a person who owns, operates, or controls a milk plant.
21–424.
(A) After the milk product has been processed, each milk product shall be labeled
with:

HOUSE BILL 8
(1) The description of that milk product under this subtitle or the rules and
regulations adopted under this subtitle; and
(2) Any other information that the Secretary requires by rule or regulation.
(B) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(I) A MILK PRODUCT PROCESSED, PACKAGED, AND SOLD BY
DISTRIBUTORS DIRECTLY TO CONSUMERS; OR
(II) A BULK SHIPMENT OF A MILK PRODUCT BETWEEN
DISTRIBUTORS.
(2) BEFORE A GRADE A MILK PRODUCT IS SOLD TO A CONSUMER AT
RETAIL, THE GRADE A MILK PRODUCT MUST BE LABELED WITH THE DATE
ESTABLISHED BY THE MILK PROCESSOR AS THE DATE BY WHICH THE PRODUCT
SHOULD NORMALLY BE USED TO ENSURE CONSUMER QUALITY.
(3) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT
THIS SUBSECTION, INCLUDING REGULATIONS RELATED TO:
(I) THE RESPONSIBILITY FOR AFFIXING TO PACKAGES OR
OTHER CONTAINERS THE QUALITY ASSURANCE DATE REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
(II) THE MANNER, STYLE, FORM, AND PLACE OF AFFIXATION OF
THE QUALITY ASSURANCE DATE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IN A CONSPICUOUS PLACE IN A FORM THAT IS READILY SEEN AND
EASILY UNDERSTOOD BY CONSUMERS; AND
(III) ADMINISTRATION AND ENFORCEMENT OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.